Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.5 Child Day Care Grant Program

40-6.5-1.
Grant program — Child day care.

The director of human services shall establish a program of grants to establish and/or expand child daycare programs, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per grantee, and not to exceed a total expenditure of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 647, § 1.

40-6.5-2.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations establishing eligibility requirements, and provide that at least fifty percent (50%) of the total grant funds available be distributed to nonprofit agencies that meet the following standards:

Each grantee shall employ, educate, or train significant numbers of parents whose incomes are below the statewide median family income;

Each grantee shall demonstrate a need for additional child daycare services in their service delivery area; and

In selecting additional grantees for the remainder of the available funds, priority shall be given to grant proposals that would develop: (i) child daycare programs and opportunities for children with special healthcare needs; and (ii) specialized childcare programs, such as programs for parents who work nontraditional hours and programs for sick child care. All grantees must demonstrate that childcare services established under this childcare grant program will be certified or licensed in accordance with Rhode Island law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 647, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 97; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 97.